Wyoming, session 2026, SF0045.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 11-25-210 is created to read:
11-25-210. Simulcasting permits; rulemaking; local
approval; permit conditions; revocation; judicial review.
(a) Simulcasting shall be conducted only by a person
holding a simulcasting permit issued by the commission and
approved by the local approving authority under this
section.
(b) The commission shall promulgate rules for
simulcasting that are reasonably necessary to protect the
public interest.
(c) A simulcasting permit is a type of pari-mutuel
event permit and, except as specifically provided for in
this section, is subject to the same terms and conditions,
and shall be issued and renewed by the commission in the
same manner as pari-mutuel event permits issued under this
act.
(d) A simulcasting permit issued or renewed by the
commission off the permitted premises shall be subject to
the following:
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0045
ENROLLED ACT NO. 51, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(i) If the simulcasting will be conducted within
the corporate limits of any city or town the permit or
renewal shall be subject to approval by the governing body
of that city or town, subject to paragraph (iii) of this
subsection;
(ii) If the simulcasting will be conducted
outside the corporate limits of any city or town the permit
or renewal shall be subject to approval by the board of
county commissioners of the county in which the
simulcasting will be conducted, subject to paragraph (iii)
of this subsection;
(iii) If the simulcasting will be conducted
within the corporate limits of any city or town, the permit
or renewal application shall be subject to review and
objection by the board of county commissioners of the
county in which the simulcasting will be conducted. If the
simulcasting will be conducted within one-half (1/2) mile
of the corporate limits of any city that has exercised the
authority granted under W.S. 15-3-202(b)(ii), the permit or
renewal application shall be subject to review and
objection by the governing body of that city or town. Any
city, town or county that objects under this paragraph
shall submit written findings stating the basis for the
objection, including impacts on land use, public safety,
taxation or other substantial interests. The objection
shall be transmitted to the local approving authority
within thirty (30) days of the objecting city, town or
county receiving the permit or renewal application. An
objection shall be deemed addressed once the local
approving authority places it on a public agenda, considers
the written findings and takes formal action to sustain,
modify or overrule the objection. No permit or renewal
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0045
ENROLLED ACT NO. 51, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
shall be approved until all timely submitted objections
have been addressed;
(iv) No simulcasting may be conducted within one
hundred (100) miles of any live pari-mutuel event permitted
under this act during the time the event is being held,
except that the commission may waive the one hundred (100)
mile limitation if the simulcasting permitholder obtains
written approval from the live pari-mutuel event
permitholder conducting the event;
(v) A simulcasting permit or renewal shall be
issued by the commission only to an applicant authorized
under this act to conduct a pari-mutuel event other than
simulcasting;
(vi) Except as provided by paragraph (e)(ii) of
this section, counties, towns and municipalities shall not
charge a monetary fee to obtain a simulcasting permit or
renewal that exceeds the actual costs of issuing the permit
or renewal.
(e) An applicant for a simulcasting permit or renewal
shall:
(i) File an application for approval with the
local approving authority. Renewal applications shall be
filed not later than ninety (90) days prior to expiration
of the permit;
(ii) At the time of filing the application, pay
an amount sufficient to reimburse the actual cost of
publishing notice of the application;
3

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0045
ENROLLED ACT NO. 51, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(iii) Identify in the application the specific
location in the city, town or county where simulcasting
will be conducted and the number of historic horse racing
terminals to be permitted at that location.
(f) After receipt of an approval or renewal
application, the local approving authority shall promptly
prepare and publish notice of the application in a
newspaper of general circulation in the state once a week
for two (2) consecutive weeks and shall post the notice on
its official website. The notice shall state that the named
applicant has applied for approval or renewal of a
simulcasting permit, that protests against the issuance or
renewal of the permit, if any, will be heard at a
designated meeting of the local approving authority, and
shall include the date, time and meeting place of the
designated meeting. For a renewal application, the local
approving authority shall hold the designated meeting not
later than thirty (30) days prior to expiration of the
permit.
(g) A local approving authority, in considering the
approval or renewal of simulcasting permits issued by the
commission:
(i) Shall not approve or deny an application
before the date set for the designated meeting in the
published notice of the application;
(ii) Shall not consider, modify or impose
conditions that are solely within the jurisdiction of the
commission;
4

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0045
ENROLLED ACT NO. 51, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(iii) May impose reasonable conditions on
approval or renewal, which shall be negotiated in good
faith with the applicant, including the following:
(A) A schedule of operating hours for the
permitted premises, provided the hours of operation shall
not be more restrictive than the hours of operation for
alcohol sales set pursuant to W.S. 12-5-101 for the holder
of a retail liquor license under W.S. 12-4-201;
(B) Designation of areas within the
permitted premises where historic horse racing terminals
may be located, to the extent the designations are not
inconsistent with rules of the commission.
(iv) May modify any condition imposed under
paragraph (iii) of this subsection only upon a showing of
good cause;
(v) Shall grant approval for the same term as is
granted by the commission for the simulcasting permit, if
the application is approved;
(vi) Shall issue written findings and
conclusions if the application is denied;
(vii) Shall have the right to revoke approval or
deny a renewal only for good cause, which shall be limited
to any of the following:
(A) A breach of a reasonable condition
imposed by the local approving authority or the commission,
if the permitholder fails to take reasonable steps to cure
the breach within ten (10) business days after receiving
written notice of the breach from the local approving
5

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0045
ENROLLED ACT NO. 51, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
authority or the commission, or a date agreed upon by the
permitholder and the local approving authority or
commission;
(B) Notification from the commission that
the permitholder has been found in violation of any Wyoming
gaming law specified in this chapter, W.S. 6-7-101 through
6-7-104 or 9-24-101 through 9-24-106;
(C) Failure to demonstrate commencement of
simulcasting at the permitted location within two (2) years
after the permit is issued. Upon a showing of good cause by
the permitholder, the local approving authority and
commission may extend the period for commencement of
simulcasting for one (1) additional year;
(D) The welfare of the people residing in
the vicinity of the permitted premises is adversely and
seriously affected by the permitted premises.
(h) A simulcasting permitholder may appeal a denial
of renewal or revocation of approval by the local approving
authority to the district court in the county where the
permitted premises are located.
(j) An applicant for a new simulcasting permit may
appeal a decision of the local approving authority to the
district court in the county where the application is filed
only if that authority has previously granted approval for
a simulcasting permit within its jurisdiction. If the
local approving authority has not previously granted an
approval for a simulcasting permit, the applicant shall
have no right of appeal from the decision of the local
approving authority.
6

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0045
ENROLLED ACT NO. 51, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(k) Subject to the approval of the local approving
authority, the transfer of an existing simulcasting permit
involving a change of location within the same local
approving authority's area of jurisdiction shall be treated
as a renewal of a simulcasting permit. A transfer involving
a change of location outside of the current local approving
authority's area of jurisdiction shall be treated as a new
application and shall be subject to all application, review
and approval requirements applicable to a new simulcasting
permit.
Section 2. W.S. 11-25-102(a)(vii)(intro) and by
creating new paragraphs (xxiii) and (xxiv),
11-25-104(g)(intro) and 11-25-201(a) are amended to read:
11-25-102. Definitions.
(a) As used in this act:
(vii) "Simulcasting" means the sale of
pari-mutuel pools electronically transmitted live or
historic on interstate or intrastate pari-mutuel events as
prescribed by the commission;. The commission shall
authorize simulcasting subject to the following conditions:
(xxiii) "Local approving authority" means the
local authority with responsibility to approve, deny or
revoke a site-specific application or renewal for a
simulcasting permit issued by the commission;
(xxiv) "Local authority" means the governing
body of a city, town or county in Wyoming.
7

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0045
ENROLLED ACT NO. 51, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
11-25-104. Gaming commission; officers; director;
meetings; quorum; records; licenses generally; effect of
financial interest in events.
(g) The commission may delegate authority to enforce
rules of the commission and this act to three (3) stewards
at each live pari-mutuel event, at least one (1) of whom
shall be an employee of and selected by the commission. The
commission shall require at least one (1) steward to
supervise each simulcast location that is approved by the
commission. Stewards shall exercise such reasonable and
necessary authority as is designated by rules of the
commission including the following:
11-25-201. Pari-mutuel permits; fees and reports;
disposition of funds; enforcement of provisions.
(a) The commission may issue pari-mutuel permits for
a specified period not to exceed three (3) years from the
date of issuance to any Wyoming county, city, incorporated
town, county fair board or any corporation or association
which that has been approved by the board of county
commissioners, except as provided for simulcasting permits
in W.S. 11-25-210, and that provides a bond acceptable to
the commission. No permit shall be granted to any city,
town, county, county fair board or any corporation or
association except upon the express condition that it shall
not, by any lease, contract, understanding or arrangement
of whatever kind or nature, grant, assign or turn over to
any person, corporation or association the operation or
management of the pari-mutuel event permitted under this
act or of the pari-mutuel system of wagering or in any
manner permit any person, corporation or association to
retain any of the money received for admission to the race
meeting or from the operations of the pari-mutuel system.
8

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0045
ENROLLED ACT NO. 51, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
The commission shall revoke the permit of any permittee for
any violation of the foregoing condition and such acts are
a violation of this act. The permit is effective only for
the times and at the places for which issued. In addition
to all other fees and charges, there shall be charged
before issuance of a permit a daily fee established by the
commission to defray expenses of enforcing this act.
Section 3. W.S. 11-25-102(a)(vii)(A) through (D) is
repealed.
Section 4.
(a) Notwithstanding W.S. 11-25-210, as created by
this act, a person holding a simulcasting permit as of the
effective date of this act shall be authorized to continue
operations through December 31, 2027, subject to the
conditions of the existing permit and approval.
(b) Subject to this subsection, on and after July 1,
2027, a person holding a simulcasting permit as of the
effective date of this act shall be subject to the
requirements of W.S. 11-25-210. A city, town or county may
deny or withhold approval of a simulcasting facility
permitted as of the effective date of this act, only upon a
showing of good cause, as specified in W.S.
11‑25‑210(g)(vii).
9

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0045
ENROLLED ACT NO. 51, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 5. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
10